Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.750

Reliance on agreement—Limitation of liability.

(1) A person who receives the original or a copy of a supported decision-making agreement shall rely on the agreement.

(2) A person is not subject to criminal or civil liability and has not engaged in professional misconduct for an act or omission if the act or omission is done in good faith and in reliance on a supported decision-making agreement.

[ 2020 c 312 s 611.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.